North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159I. Solid Waste Management Loan Program and Local Government Special Obligation Bonds. [Repealed]
§§ 159I-1 through 159I-29.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019.

History.

G.S. 159I-1

; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2002-72, s. 21; repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-2; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.26(b), effective July 1, 2011. G.S. 159I-3; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 888, s. 2; c. 1004, ss. 20, 47.1; c. 1024, s. 48; 1995, c. 461, s. 12; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 743, s. 24; 1997-443, s. 11A.123; 2011-266, s. 1.26(a), (c); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-4; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; repealed by 2011-266, s. 1.26(b), effective July 1, 2011. G.S. 159I-5; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-6; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-7; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 21; c. 1024, s. 49; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-8; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 1995, c. 384, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-9; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019.

G.S. 159I-1

0; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-11; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2007-182, s. 2; repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-12; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-13; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-14; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-15; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, ss. 22, 23; c. 1024, s. 38(a), (b); 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-16; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, ss. 24, 25; c. 1024, s. 38(c), (d); 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-17; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-18; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-19; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-20; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-21; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-22; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-23; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 1995, c. 46, s. 19; 2015-264, s. 16(j); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-24; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2011-266, s. 1.26(c); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-25; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-26; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-27; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-28; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.114; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2007-182, s. 2; repealed by 2019-32, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2019. G.S. 159I-29; 1989, c. 756, s. 1; 1993, c. 553, s. 57; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2012-200, s. 26; repealed by 2015-286, S. 4.12(e), effective October 22, 2015.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 159I-1

pertained to the short title. Former G.S. 159I-2 pertained to findings and purpose. Former G.S. 159I-3 pertained to definitions. Former G.S. 159I-4 pertained to creation of the North Carolina Solid Waste Management Capital Projects Financing Agency, and was previously repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.26(b), effective July 1, 2011. Former G.S. 159I-5 pertained to general powers of the Board. G.S. 159I-6 pertained to specific powers of the Board. Former G.S. 159I-7 pertained to the Solid Waste Management Loan Fund. Former G.S. 159I-8 pertained to eligible purpose. Former G.S. 159I-9 pertained to application. Former

G.S. 159I-1

0 pertained to eligible applicant. Former G.S. 159I-11 pertained to priority factors. Former G.S. 159I-12 pertained to units of local government authorized to borrow money from the Board by loans. Former G.S. 159I-13 pertained to sources and security for units of local government. Former G.S. 159I-14 pertained to credit of State not pledged. Former G.S. 159I-15 pertained to bonds and notes. Former G.S. 159I-16 pertained to trust agreement or resolution. Former G.S. 159I-17 pertained to trust funds. Former G.S. 159I-18 pertained to remedies. Former G.S. 159I-19 pertained to status of bonds and notes under Uniform Commercial Code. Former G.S. 159I-20 pertained to bonds and notes eligible for investment. Former G.S. 159I-21 pertained to refunding bonds and notes. Former G.S. 159I-22 pertained to officers not liable. Former G.S. 159I-23 pertained to tax exemption. Former G.S. 159I-24 pertained to conflicts of interest. Former G.S. 159I-25 pertained to disbursement. Former G.S. 159I-26 pertained to withdrawal of commitment. Former G.S. 159I-27 pertained to inspection. Former G.S. 159I-28 pertained to rules. Former G.S. 159I-29 pertained to annual reports to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, and was previously repealed by Session Laws 2015-286, s. 4.12(e), effective October 22, 2015.

Session Laws 2019-32, s. 7, provides: “This act becomes effective July 1, 2019. All rules, regulations, and decisions made by the predecessor boards and authorities reconstituted in this act shall remain in full force and effect until and unless duly modified by the successor entities.”

§ 159I-30.

Reenacted, recodified and rewritten as

G.S. 159-146

by Session Laws 2020-3, s. 4.30(a), effective retroactively to July 1, 2019.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2020-3, s. 4.30(a), effective retroactively to July 1, 2019, reenacted this section as it existed immediately before its expiration, and recodified and rewrote it as

G.S. 159-146

.

Session Laws 2020-3, s. 5, is a severability clause.